Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1404
Articles of incorporation; filing; certified copy as evidence; fees.

The articles of incorporation and amendments thereof shall be filed in accordance with the general corporation laws of this state and when so filed the said articles of incorporation and amendments thereof or certified copies thereof shall be received in all the courts of this state as prima facie evidence of the facts contained therein and of the due incorporation of such association. The fees for the incorporation of nonstock cooperative associations shall be the same as those required by law of other nonprofit corporations.

Laws 1925, c. 80, § 4, p. 249;

C.S.1929, § 24-1404;

R.S.1943, § 21-1404;

Laws 1981, LB 283, § 4.